Tennessee, session 114, HB2394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
5-17-109.
If a county establishes a county-wide fire department pursuant to this chapter,
then it is the legislative intent that the governing body of the county direct priority for the
appropriation and allocation of county funds, whether from the general fund or other
sources of revenue selected under § 5-17-101, to fund the activities of the county-wide
fire department. It is further the legislative intent that the county-wide fire department
receive appropriations from the county at a level at least equivalent to the level of
funding provided by the county for the operation of the sheriff's department.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 9, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
5-9-116.
If a volunteer fire department provides fire protection services to all of a county
and its governing board requests funding from the county, then it is the legislative intent
that the governing body of the county direct priority for the appropriation and allocation of
county funds, whether from the general fund or other sources of revenue, to fund the
activities of the volunteer fire department. As used in this section, "volunteer fire
department" means a fire department recognized by the state fire marshal's office,
HB2394
010693
- 1 -

pursuant to § 68-102-304, and classified by the Tennessee Fire Incident Reporting
System (TFIRS) as a volunteer fire department.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010693